Maryland, session 2026, HB0729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–214.1.
(a) In this section:
(1) “precious metal bullion or coins” means:
(i) any precious metal that has gone through a refining process and
is in a state or condition such that its value depends on its precious metal content and not
on its form; or
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, monetized
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0729*

HOUSE BILL 729
bullion, coins, or other forms of money that:
1. are manufactured from precious metals; and
2. are or have in the past been used as a medium of exchange
under the laws of the State, the United States, or a foreign nation; and
(2) “precious metal bullion or coins” does not include jewelry or a work of
art made of precious metal bullion or coins.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to a sale of precious metal bullion or coins
[if:
(1) the sale price is greater than $1,000; and
(2) the sale occurs at the Baltimore Convention Center].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.